Colorado, session 2026A, HB1235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-1-803 as
follows:
25.5-1-803. Transportation provider data reporting
requirements.
(1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER, EACH TRANSPORTATION BROKER SHALL REPORT
THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT:
(a) REGARDING EACH TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER THAT THE
TRANSPORTATION BROKER CONTRACTS WITH:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF RIDES REQUESTED;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF RIDES COMPLETED;
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF RIDES CANCELED BY MEMBERS AND THE
TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER;
(IV) THE TOTAL COST OF RIDES COMPLETED CATEGORIZED BY
PROCEDURE CODE; AND
(V) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CALLS RECEIVED FROM MEMBERS
REQUESTING NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION AND THE
AVERAGE TIME A MEMBER SPENT ON HOLD;
(b) THE NUMBER OF GRIEVANCES SUBMITTED BY MEMBERS
REGARDING A TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER THAT WERE SUBSTANTIATED,
AND THE TRANSPORTATION PROVIDER THAT THE GRIEVANCE CONCERNS; AND
(c) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TRANSPORTATION PROVIDERS
TERMINATED FROM THE TRANSPORTATION BROKER'S NETWORK, ON A
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN, OR ON A PERFORMANCE IMPROVEMENT PLAN.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL
INCLUDE AS PART OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S "SMART ACT"
PRESENTATION REQUIRED BY SECTION 2-7-203 THE INFORMATION
SUBMITTED TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT BY THE TRANSPORTATION BROKERS
AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-103, amend
(20) as follows:
25.5-4-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(20) "Qualified alien"shall have "QUALIFIED NONCITIZEN" HAS the
meaning ascribed to that term in section 431 (b) of the federal "Personal
Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public
Law 104-193, as amended.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-4-218 as
follows:
25.5-4-218. Multiple procedure payment reductions for
outpatient therapy - prohibition - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "MULTIPLE PROCEDURE PAYMENT REDUCTION" MEANS A
REIMBURSEMENT METHODOLOGY THAT REDUCES PAYMENT FOR ONE OR
MORE DIFFERENT SERVICES FURNISHED TO A MEMBER DURING THE SAME
DATE OF SERVICE, ENCOUNTER, OR EPISODE OF CARE BASED SOLELY ON THE
NUMBER, SEQUENCING, OR COMBINATION OF DIFFERENT SERVICES
PERFORMED.
(b) "OUTPATIENT THERAPY SERVICES" MEANS PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES PROVIDED BY AN OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST, PHYSICAL THERAPIST,
OR SPEECH LANGUAGE PATHOLOGIST IN A SETTING OTHER THAN A HOSPITAL.
(2) IF THE STATE DEPARTMENT PLANS TO IMPLEMENT, APPLY, OR
ENFORCE A NEW MULTIPLE PROCEDURE PAYMENT REDUCTION FOR
OUTPATIENT THERAPY SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM, THE STATE DEPARTMENT MUST PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE
IMPACTED PROVIDERS OF THE FORTHCOMING CHANGE AT LEAST SIX MONTHS
PRIOR TO IMPLEMENTING THE CHANGE TO ENSURE ADEQUATE TIME FOR
PROVIDERS TO PREPARE AND HOLD AT LEAST ONE STAKEHOLDER MEETING
TO DISCUSS THE IMPLEMENTATION, APPLICATION, AND ENFORCEMENT OF THE
NEW MULTIPLE PROCEDURE PAYMENT REDUCTION FOR OUTPATIENT THERAPY
SERVICES. THE STAKEHOLDER PROCESS MUST INCLUDE A DISCUSSION
REGARDING THE METRICS THE STATE DEPARTMENT PLANS TO USE IN
IMPLEMENTING THE CHANGES.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-4-219 as
follows:
25.5-4-219. Community engagement requirements for medicaid
eligibility - notice to revisor of statutes - rules - reporting - repeal.
(1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE BOARD SHALL
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

ADOPT RULES THAT ARE NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT OF 1965", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396a(xx), AS AMENDED OR
RELOCATED, IN A MANNER THAT ENSURES ALL APPLICANTS AND MEMBERS
CAN OBTAIN OR MAINTAIN COVERAGE WITH THE LEAST AMOUNT OF
ADMINISTRATIVE BURDENS.
(2) THE STATE BOARD'S AUTHORITY TO ADOPT RULES PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IS REPEALED IF THE COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT OF 1965", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396a(xx), AS AMENDED OR
RELOCATED, ARE REPEALED.
(3) THE STATE BOARD SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN
WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS SECTION IS REPEALED,
EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE, OR IF THE NOTICE
DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE NOTICE TO THE
REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(4) (a) BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2027, AND EACH MONTH THEREAFTER,
THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAKE THE FOLLOWING DATA CONCERNING
ENROLLMENT IN THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AVAILABLE ON THE
STATE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE THAT
WERE APPROVED AND DENIED;
(II) THE NUMBER OF RENEWAL APPLICATIONS FOR MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE THAT WERE APPROVED AND DENIED;
(III) THE NUMBER OF MEMBERS WHOSE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
ELIGIBILITY WAS RENEWED USING EXISTING DATA AND RECORDS WITHOUT
REQUIRING THE MEMBER TO SUBMIT ADDITIONAL INFORMATION;
(IV) THE RATE OF REENROLLMENT IN THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER A MEMBER'S RENEWAL APPLICATION
FOR MEDICAL ASSISTANCE WAS DENIED; AND
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

(V) OTHER DATA THE STATE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES IS
NECESSARY TO SHARE WITH THE PUBLIC AND ANY OTHER DATA THAT MAY
BE FEDERALLY REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH THE COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT
REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL SECURITY ACT OF
1965", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396a (xx), AS AMENDED OR RELOCATED.
(b) THE PURPOSE OF THE REPORTING REQUIREMENT SET FORTH IN
THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS TO DEMONSTRATE THE IMPACTS OF THE COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE XIX OF THE FEDERAL "SOCIAL
SECURITY ACT OF 1965", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396a (xx), AS AMENDED OR
RELOCATED, ON ELIGIBILITY AND ENROLLMENT IN THE MEDICAL ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM.
(c) THE STATE DEPARTMENT'S DUTY TO POST DATA ON THE STATE
DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS REPEALED IF
THE COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE XIX OF THE
FEDERAL "SOCIAL SECURITY ACT OF 1965", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1396a (xx), AS
AMENDED OR RELOCATED, ARE REPEALED.
(d) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL
NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE
CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (4)(c) OF THIS SECTION HAS OCCURRED
BY EMAILING THE NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. THIS
SECTION (4) IS REPEALED EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE
NOTICE, OR IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF
THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-401.5, amend
(1)(c)(I) as follows:
25.5-4-401.5. Review of provider rates - advisory committee -
recommendations - repeal.
(1) (c) (I) The state department may propose to exclude rates from
the schedule established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section if those
rates are adjusted OR REVIEWED on a periodic basis as a result of other state
statute or federal law or regulation. The state department shall include the
proposed list of exclusions with the schedule established pursuant to
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-4-505.5, amend
(5) as follows:
25.5-4-505.5. Federal authorization related to persons involved
in the criminal justice system - report - rules - legislative declaration.
(5) (a) The state department shall only reimburse an opioid treatment
program, as defined in section 27-80-203, for administering
medication-assisted treatment REIMBURSE A PROVIDER WHO IS LICENSED
AND AUTHORIZED TO PRESCRIBE, DISPENSE, COMPOUND, OR ADMINISTER
MEDICATION-ASSISTED TREATMENT in a jail setting. At a minimum, an
opioid treatment program that administers medication-assisted treatment
shall:
(I) Employ a physician medical director;
(II) Ensure the individual receiving medication-assisted treatment
undergoes a minimum observation period after receiving
medication-assisted treatment as determined by behavioral health
administration rule pursuant to section 27-80-204; and
(III) Meet all critical incident reporting requirements as determined
by behavioral health administration rule pursuant to section 27-80-204.
(b) The state department shall ensure as part of the state
department's quality oversight that opioid treatment programs that LICENSED
PROVIDERS WHO administer medication-assisted treatment in a jail setting
maintain emergency policies and procedures that address adverse outcomes.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-101, repeal (2);
and add (1)(n) and (1)(o) as follows:
25.5-5-101. Mandatory provisions - eligible groups - rules.
(1) In order to participate in the medicaid program, the federal
government requires the state to provide medical assistance to certain
eligible groups. Pursuant to federal law and except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, any person who is eligible for medical
assistance under the mandated groups specified in this section must receive
both the mandatory services that are specified in sections 25.5-5-102 and
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

25.5-5-103 and the optional services that are specified in sections
25.5-5-202 and 25.5-5-203. Subject to the availability of federal financial
participation, the following are the individuals or groups that are mandated
under federal law to receive benefits under this article 5 and articles 4 and
6 of this title 25.5:
(n) A QUALIFIED NONCITIZEN WHO ENTERED THE UNITED STATES
BEFORE AUGUST 22, 1996, SHALL RECEIVE BENEFITS UNDER THIS ARTICLE 5
AND ARTICLES 4 AND 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5;
(o) A QUALIFIED NONCITIZEN WHO ENTERED THE UNITED STATES ON
OR AFTER AUGUST 22,1996, IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR BENEFITS UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 5 OR ARTICLE 4 OR 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5 FOR FIVE YEARS AFTER THE
DATE OF ENTRY IN THE UNITED STATES; EXCEPT THAT THE STATE
DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE BENEFITS UNDER THIS ARTICLE 5 AND ARTICLES
4 AND 6 OF THIS TITLE 25.5 TO A PREGNANT PERSON WHO IS A QUALIFIED
ALIEN NONCITIZEN AND A CHILD UNDER NINETEEN YEARS OLD WHO IS A
QUALIFIED NONCITIZEN, SO LONG AS THE PREGNANT PERSON OR CHILD MEETS
ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA OTHER THAN CITIZENSHIP. COVERAGE OF INDIVIDUALS
IN THIS GROUP IS SUBJECT TO THE RECEIPT OF FEDERAL FINANCIAL
PARTICIPATION, UNLESS STATE FUNDS ARE SPECIFICALLY APPROPRIATED FOR
COVERAGE OF GROUPS FOR WHOM FEDERAL FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION IS
UNAVAILABLE.
(2) (a) A qualified alien who entered the United States before
August 22, 1996, who meets the exceptions described in the federal
"Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of
1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended, shall receive benefits under this
article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.
(b) (I) A qualified alien who entered the United States on or after
August 22, 1996, shall not be eligible for benefits under this article or
article 4 or 6 of this title, except as provided in section 25.5-5-103 (3), for
five years after the date of entry into the United States unless he or she
meets the exceptions described in the federal "Personal Responsibility and
Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as
amended.
(II) Notwithstanding the five-year waiting period established in
subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), but subject to the availability of
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

sufficient appropriations and the receipt of federal financial participation,
the state department may provide benefits under this article and articles 4
and 6 of this title to a pregnant woman who is a qualified alien and a child
under nineteen years of age who is a qualified alien so long as such woman
or child meets eligibility criteria other than citizenship.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25.5-5-201, amend
(1)(j) and (1)(k); and repeal (2) as follows:
25.5-5-201. Optional provisions - optional groups - rules.
(1) The federal government allows the state to select optional groups
to receive medical assistance. Pursuant to federal law, any person who is
eligible for medical assistance under the optional groups specified in this
section must receive both the mandatory services specified in sections
25.5-5-102 and 25.5-5-103 and the optional services specified in sections
25.5-5-202 and 25.5-5-203. Subject to the availability of federal financial
aid funds, the following are the individuals or groups that Colorado has
selected as optional groups to receive medical assistance pursuant to this
article 5 and articles 4 and 6 of this title 25.5:
(j) Individuals who are qualified aliens NONCITIZENS and were or
would have been eligible for supplemental security income as a result of a
disability but are not eligible for such supplemental security income as a
result of the passage of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work
Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193;
(k) Other qualified aliens NONCITIZENS who entered or were present
in the United States before August 22, 1996;
(2) (a) A qualified alien, who entered the United States on or after
August 22, 1996, shall not be eligible for benefits under this article and
articles 4 and 6 of this title, except as provided in section 25.5-5-103 (3), for
five years after the date of entry into the United States unless he or she
meets the exceptions described in the federal "Personal Responsibility and
Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as
amended. After five years, such qualified alien shall be eligible for benefits
under this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title but shall have sponsor
income and resources deemed to the individual or family under rules
established by the state board of human services pursuant to section
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

26-2-137, C.R.S.
(b) Notwithstanding the five-year waiting period established in
paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), but subject to the availability of
sufficient appropriations and the receipt of federal financial participation,
the state department may provide benefits under this article and articles 4
and 6 of this title to a pregnant woman who is a qualified alien and a child
under nineteen years of age who is a qualified alien so long as such woman
or child meets eligibility criteria other than citizenship.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-6-120 as
follows:
25.5-6-120. Home- and community-based service provider
agencies - disclosure of direct care service cost ratio to administrative
cost ratio - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "DIRECT CARE SERVICE COST TO ADMINISTRATIVE COST RATIO"
MEANS THE PERCENTAGE OF MEDICAID SERVICES REVENUE THAT A HOME-
AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY THAT RENDERS BASE
WAGE QUALIFYING SERVICES SPENDS ON DIRECT CARE WORKFORCE
COMPENSATION AND DIRECT CARE SERVICE RELATED TRAINING AND
SUPPORTS AS COMPARED TO ADMINISTRATIVE AND GENERAL EXPENSES.
(2) (a) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION FROM EACH HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE
PROVIDER AGENCY THAT SERVES MORE THAN THIRTY MEMBERS AND IS
SUBJECT TO THE BASE WAGE REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT
IN RULE, AND MAY COLLECT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FROM A HOME-
AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY THAT SERVES THIRTY
OR FEWER MEMBERS:
(I) THE TOTAL MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM REIMBURSEMENT
AND VOLUME DATA FOR HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES THAT ARE
SUBJECT TO THE BASE WAGE REQUIREMENTS, SORTED BY SERVICE CODES
AND SUBMITTED SEPARATELY FOR EMPLOYEES AND INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTORS;
(II) DIRECT WAGES AND CASH COMPENSATION, WHICH ARE LIMITED
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

TO WAGES, OVERTIME PAY, BONUSES, AND OTHER DIRECT MONETARY
COMPENSATION PAID TO DIRECT CARE WORKERS;
(III) PAID LEAVE AND EMPLOYEE BENEFITS, WHICH ARE LIMITED TO
PAID LEAVE, HEALTH INSURANCE, RETIREMENT CONTRIBUTIONS, AND OTHER
INSURANCE BENEFITS, WELLNESS SUPPORT, TRANSPORTATION BENEFITS, AND
OTHER MONETARY OR NON-MONETARY EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS;
(IV) EMPLOYER PAYROLL TAXES AND STATUTORY EMPLOYMENT
COSTS, WHICH ARE LIMITED TO EMPLOYER PAYROLL TAXES, STATE
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE CONTRIBUTIONS, AND FEDERAL
UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE CONTRIBUTIONS;
(V) WORKFORCE RECRUITMENT, RETENTION, AND INCENTIVE
SUPPORTS, WHICH ARE LIMITED TO STIPENDS, REIMBURSEMENTS,
ALLOWANCES, INCENTIVE PROGRAMS, AND OTHER BENEFITS DESIGNED TO
RECRUIT, RETAIN AND SUPPORT THE WELL-BEING OF DIRECT CARE WORKERS;
(VI) WORKFORCE SUPERVISION, TRAINING AND OPERATIONAL
SUPPORT, WHICH ARE LIMITED TO COSTS RELATED TO SUPERVISING DIRECT
CARE WORKERS, PROVIDING TRAINING, AND MAINTAINING WORKFORCE
SUPPORT SERVICES NECESSARY FOR SAFE SERVICE DELIVERY AND
REGULATORY COMPLIANCE;
(VII) OPERATIONAL AND COMPLIANCE COSTS TIED TO EMPLOYMENT
OF DIRECT CARE WORKERS, WHICH ARE LIMITED TO EMPLOYER EXPENSES
NECESSARY TO RECRUIT, EMPLOY, SUPERVISE, SUPPORT, AND RETAIN DIRECT
CARE WORKERS, INCLUDING OPERATIONAL COSTS REQUIRED TO SAFELY
DELIVER MEDICAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES AND COMPLY WITH MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS; AND
(VIII) EXISTING BASE WAGE REPORTING AND ATTESTATION
DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING THAT DIRECT CARE WORKER WAGES MEET THE
STATE BASE WAGE REQUIREMENTS.
(b) A HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICE PROVIDER AGENCY
SHALL SUBMIT TO THE STATE DEPARTMENT ITS DIRECT CARE SERVICE COST
TO ADMINISTRATIVE COST RATIO AND THE INFORMATION REQUIRED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2) NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 30, 2027.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

(3) THE STATE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT DETAILING THE
INFORMATION COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND SENATE HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES COMMITTEES AND THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, OR ANY
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2027.
(4) THE DATA COLLECTED AND PUBLISHED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION MUST BE USED SOLELY FOR LEGISLATIVE INFORMATIONAL PURPOSES
AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE "COLORADO OPEN
RECORDS ACT," PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF TITLE 24.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 25.5-4-203.
SECTION 11. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1235

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1235